Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.210

District may not be formed to operate certain translator stations.

No television reception improvement district may be formed to operate and maintain any translator station presently or previously owned, operated or maintained by a television broadcaster.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 21.]